Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0265

"Player."

"Player," as used in this chapter, means a natural person who engages, on equal terms with the other participants, and solely as a contestant or bettor, in any form of gambling in which no person may receive or become entitled to receive any profit therefrom other than personal gambling winnings, and without otherwise rendering any material assistance to the establishment, conduct or operation of a particular gambling activity. A natural person who gambles at a social game of chance on equal terms with the other participants shall not be considered as rendering material assistance to the establishment, conduct or operation of the social game merely by performing, without fee or remuneration, acts directed toward the arrangement or facilitation of the game, such as inviting persons to play, permitting the use of premises for the game, or supplying cards or other equipment to be used in the games. A person who engages in "bookmaking" as defined in this chapter is not a "player." A person who pays a fee or "vigorish" enabling him or her to place a wager with a bookmaker, or pays a fee other than as authorized by this chapter to participate in a card game, contest of chance, lottery, or gambling activity, is not a player.

[ 1997 c 118 s 2; 1991 c 261 s 2; 1987 c 4 s 17. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(16).]